Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1134HH (6) 91 jda/jh H.F. 253 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Adopt a core curriculum and adopt rules that establish high 4 school graduation requirements for all students in school 5 districts and accredited nonpublic schools that include at a 6 minimum satisfactory completion of four years of English and 7 language arts, three years of mathematics, three years of 8 science, and three years of social studies , and, beginning 9 with students in the 2029-2030 school year graduating class, 10 one semester of computer science, or the trimester or quarter 11 equivalent, which may include computer science instruction 12 provided in grade eight pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 13 4 . 14 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 15 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 16 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The five units of science may include 17 up to one unit of instruction related to computer science. 18 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e and l, 19 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 20 e. Two additional units of mathematics. 21 (1) The two additional units of mathematics may include 22 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 23 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 24 distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 25 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 26 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 27 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 28 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 29 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this paragraph 30 subparagraph . 31 (2) The two additional units of mathematics may include up 32 to one unit of instruction related to computer science. 33 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing with 34 the school year beginning July 1, 2022 . The one-half unit of 35 -1- LSB 1134HH (6) 91 jda/jh 1/ 8 H.F. 253 computer science shall incorporate the standards established 1 pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , 2 subparagraph (4) , and may be offered online in accordance 3 with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32 , 4 paragraph âaâ . The one-half unit of computer science shall 5 satisfy all of the following requirements: 6 (a) Be of high quality. 7 (b) Meet or exceed the curriculum standards and 8 requirements established by the state board. 9 (c) Be offered and taught in a traditional classroom 10 setting; provided, however, that if a traditional classroom 11 setting is not feasible, the one-half unit of computer science 12 may be offered and taught in any of the following ways: 13 (i) Through a combination of instruction that is delivered 14 in a traditional classroom setting and instruction that is 15 delivered primarily over the internet. 16 (ii) Through instruction that is delivered primarily over 17 the internet in accordance with rules adopted by the state 18 board pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32, paragraph 19 âaâ , and is tailored to meet the needs of each participating 20 student. 21 (2) (a) All students, beginning with students in the 22 2029-2030 school year graduating class, shall complete one-half 23 unit of computer science as a condition of graduation, which 24 may include computer science instruction provided in grade 25 eight pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 4. The condition 26 of graduation shall not apply to a student who enrolls in a 27 school district or an accredited nonpublic school in grade 28 twelve immediately after being enrolled in a school located 29 outside of this state. 30 (b) On or before July 1, 2029, a school district or 31 accredited nonpublic school may apply to the department of 32 education for a one-time waiver of the implementation of the 33 condition of graduation described in this subparagraph. The 34 waiver shall be for a period not longer than one school year. 35 -2- LSB 1134HH (6) 91 jda/jh 2/ 8 H.F. 253 (c) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 1 17A establishing standards for the submission of applications 2 for waivers of the implementation of the condition of 3 graduation described in this subparagraph and the departmentâs 4 consideration and approval of waivers. 5 (3) The department shall publish on the departmentâs 6 internet site a list of computer science courses that satisfy 7 the rules adopted by the state board pursuant to section 256.7, 8 subsection 32, paragraph âcâ , and that a school district or 9 accredited nonpublic school may use to implement the graduation 10 requirement described in subparagraph (2). The list shall 11 include the names of the computer science courses and the 12 course codes associated with each computer science course. 13 (4) Each school district shall report annually to the 14 department all of the following: 15 (a) To the extent such information is available, the course 16 names and course codes associated with all computer science 17 courses offered and taught in the school district pursuant to 18 this paragraph and a description of format in which each course 19 is offered and taught. 20 (b) The number of teachers employed by the school district 21 who teach computer science instruction, sortable by the 22 endorsements and authorizations held by each teacher and the 23 highest academic degree attained by each teacher. The report 24 shall not include any personally identifiable information 25 related to the teachers employed by the school district who 26 teach computer science instruction. 27 (c) The number of students enrolled in a computer science 28 course offered and taught by the school district pursuant to 29 this paragraph, sortable by the grade level of each student. 30 The report shall not include any personally identifiable 31 information related to the students enrolled in a computer 32 science course offered and taught by the school district. 33 Sec. 4. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code 34 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 35 -3- LSB 1134HH (6) 91 jda/jh 3/ 8 H.F. 253 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) Units of instruction provided 1 under subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b) or (c), may 2 include up to one unit of instruction related to computer 3 science, if the teacher providing such instruction has either 4 an initial career and technical education authorization issued 5 by the board of educational examiners or a career and technical 6 education authorization issued by the board of educational 7 examiners. 8 Sec. 5. Section 256.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 256.13 Nonresident pupils. 11 The boards of directors of two or more school districts may 12 by agreement provide for attendance of pupils residing in one 13 district in the schools of another district for the purpose of 14 taking courses not offered in the district of their residence , 15 including computer science courses described in section 256.11, 16 subsection 5, paragraph âlâ . The boards may also provide by 17 agreement that the districts will combine their enrollments 18 for one or more grades. Courses and grades made available to 19 students in this manner shall be considered as complying with 20 any standards or laws requiring the offering of such courses 21 and grades. The boards of directors of districts entering into 22 such agreements may provide for sharing the costs and expenses 23 of the courses. If the agreement provides for whole grade 24 sharing, the costs and expenses shall be paid as provided in 25 sections 282.10 through 282.12 . 26 Sec. 6. Section 256.146, subsection 19, Code 2025, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 19. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing 29 endorsements and authorizations for computer science 30 instruction , including . The rules shall include traditional 31 and nontraditional pathways for obtaining such endorsements or 32 authorizations , including through instruction that is delivered 33 primarily over the internet that may be used to demonstrate 34 competence in computer science instruction for teachers under 35 -4- LSB 1134HH (6) 91 jda/jh 4/ 8 H.F. 253 an initial or conditional license . 1 Sec. 7. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 2 by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. In order to provide students with the 4 competencies to compete in a twenty-first century workforce, 5 develop skills that translate into high-wage jobs, develop 6 problem solving and critical thinking skills, and encourage 7 the creation and retention of new, high-wage jobs in this 8 state, all high school students enrolled in school districts 9 or accredited nonpublic schools, beginning with the 2029-2030 10 school year graduating class, students should complete one 11 semester of computer science as a condition of graduation as 12 required by section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph âaâ . 13 Sec. 8. Section 284.6A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 14 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 b. A school district or accredited nonpublic school may 16 apply to the department, in the manner prescribed by the 17 department, to receive moneys from the fund to provide tuition 18 reimbursement for Iowa teachers , including Iowa teachers under 19 an initial or conditional license, seeking endorsements or 20 authorizations for computer science under section 256.146, 21 subsection 19 . 22 Sec. 9. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 23 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 24 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 25 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 26 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 27 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 28 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 29 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 30 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 31 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 32 districts. 33